Utah statutes.
16-10a-1401.   Authorization of dissolution prior to issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, a majority of its directors, or if no directors have been elected or if elected directors are no longer serving, a majority of its incorporators may authorize the dissolution of the corporation.

